Utah statutes.
17-36-30.   Interfund loans -- Acquisition of issued unmatured bonds.

The governing body may (1) authorize interfund loans from one fund to another at such interest rates and subject to such terms for repayment as it may prescribe and may (2) with available cash in any fund, purchase or otherwise acquire for investment, issued unmatured bonds of the county or of any county fund.

